North Carolina statutes. Chapter 17C. North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission.
Article 1. General.

§ 17C-1.
Findings and policy.

The General Assembly finds that the administration of criminal justice is of statewide concern, and that proper administration is important to the health, safety and welfare of the people of the State and is of such nature as to require education and training of a professional nature. It is in the public interest that such education and training be made available to persons who seek to become criminal justice officers, persons who are serving as such officers in a temporary or probationary capacity, and persons already in regular service.

History.

1971, c. 963, s. 1; 1979, c. 763, s. 1.

§ 17C-2.
Definitions.

Unless the context clearly otherwise requires, the following definitions apply in this Article:

Commission. — The North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission.

Criminal justice agencies. — The State and local law-enforcement agencies, the State correctional agencies, other correctional agencies maintained by local governments, and the juvenile justice agencies, but shall not include deputy sheriffs, special deputy sheriffs, sheriffs’ jailers, or other sheriffs’ office personnel governed by the provisions of Chapter 17E of these General Statutes.

Criminal justice officers. — The administrative and subordinate personnel of all the departments, offices, agencies, units or entities comprising the criminal justice agencies who are sworn law-enforcement officers, both State and local, with the power of arrest; State correctional officers; State probation/parole officers; State probation/parole officers-surveillance; officers, supervisory and administrative personnel of local confinement facilities; State juvenile justice officers; chief court counselors; and juvenile court counselors.

(3a)

Critical incident. — An incident involving any use of force by a law enforcement officer that results in death or serious bodily injury to a person.

Entry level. — The initial appointment or employment of any person by a criminal justice agency, or any appointment or employment of a person previously employed by a criminal justice agency who has not been employed by a criminal justice agency for the 12-month period preceding this appointment or employment, or any appointment or employment of a previously certified criminal justice officer to a position which requires a different type of certification.

History.

1971, c. 963, s. 2; 1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1983, c. 558, s. 2; c. 745, s. 2; 1989, c. 757, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 4(a); 1997-503, s. 2; 2001-490, s. 1.1; 2018-5, s. 17.1(a); 2021-138, s. 3(a); 2021-182, s. 3(b).

§ 17C-3.
North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission established; members; terms; vacancies. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

There is established the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission, hereinafter called “the Commission.” The Commission shall be composed of 34 members as follows:

Police Chiefs. — Three police chiefs selected by the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police and one police chief appointed by the Governor.

Police Officers. — Three police officials appointed by the North Carolina Police Executives Association and two criminal justice officers certified by the Commission as selected by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Officers’ Association.

Departments. — The Attorney General of the State of North Carolina; the Secretary of Public Safety; the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation, the Commander of the State Highway Patrol, and the President of the North Carolina Community Colleges System.

(3a)

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-490, s. 1.2, effective June 30, 2001.

At-large Groups. — One individual representing and appointed by each of the following organizations: one mayor selected by the League of Municipalities; one law-enforcement training officer selected by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Training Officers’ Association; one criminal justice professional selected by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Association; one sworn law-enforcement officer selected by the North State Law-Enforcement Officers’ Association; one member selected by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Women’s Association; and one District Attorney selected by the North Carolina Association of District Attorneys.

Citizens and Others. — The President of The University of North Carolina; the Dean of the School of Government at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill; and two citizens, one of whom shall be selected by the Governor and one of whom shall be selected by the Attorney General. The General Assembly shall appoint four persons, two upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and two upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. Appointments by the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. Appointments by the General Assembly shall be for two-year terms to conclude on June 30th in odd-numbered years.

Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice. — Four correctional officers in management positions employed by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall be appointed, two from the Section of Community Corrections upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and two from the Section of Prisons upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. Appointments by the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. Appointments by the General Assembly shall serve two-year terms to conclude on June 30th in odd-numbered years or until the appointee no longer serves in a management position with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, whichever occurs first. The Governor shall appoint one correctional officer employed by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and assigned to the Office of Staff Development and Training, and one juvenile justice officer employed by the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice. The Governor’s appointments shall serve three-year terms or until the appointee is no longer assigned to the Office of Staff Development and Training or is no longer a juvenile justice officer, whichever occurs first.

The members shall be appointed for staggered terms. The initial appointments shall be made prior to September 1, 1983, and the appointees shall hold office until July 1 of the year in which their respective terms expire and until their successors are appointed and qualified as provided hereafter:For the terms of one year: one member from subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, serving as a police chief; three members from subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, one serving as a police official, and two criminal justice officers; one member from subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section, appointed by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Training Officers’ Association; and two members from subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section, one appointed by the Governor and one appointed by the Attorney General.For the terms of two years: one member from subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, serving as a police chief; one member from subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, serving as a police official; and two members from subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section, one appointed by the League of Municipalities and one appointed by the North Carolina Association of District Attorneys.For the terms of three years: two members from subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, one police chief appointed by the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police and one police chief appointed by the Governor; one member from subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, serving as a police official; and three members from subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section, one appointed by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Women’s Association, one appointed by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Association, and one appointed by the North State Law-Enforcement Officers’ Association.Thereafter, as the term of each member expires, his successor shall be appointed for a term of three years. Notwithstanding the appointments for a term of years, each member shall serve at the will of the appointing authority.The Attorney General, the President of The University of North Carolina, the Dean of the School of Government at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, the President of the North Carolina Community Colleges System, the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation, the Commander of the State Highway Patrol, and the Secretary of Public Safety shall be continuing members of the Commission during their tenure. These members of the Commission shall serve ex officio and shall perform their duties on the Commission in addition to the other duties of their offices. The ex officio members may elect to serve personally at any or all meetings of the Commission or may designate, in writing, one member of their respective office, department, university or agency to represent and vote for them on the Commission at all meetings the ex officio members are unable to attend.Vacancies in the Commission occurring for any reason shall be filled, for the unexpired term, by the authority making the original appointment of the person causing the vacancy. A vacancy may be created by removal of a Commission member by majority vote of the Commission for misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty. A Commission member may be removed only pursuant to a hearing, after notice, at which the member subject to removal has an opportunity to be heard.

History.

1971, c. 963, s. 3; 1977, c. 70, ss. 29, 30; 1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1191, s. 31; 1983, c. 558, s. 3; c. 618, ss. 1, 2; c. 807, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 282, s. 4; 1989, c. 757, s. 2; 1995, c. 490, s. 15; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(c); 2000-137, s. 4(d); 2000-140, s. 38.1(a); 2001-487, s. 5; 2001-490, s. 1.2; 2006-264, s. 29(c), (d); 2011-145, s. 19.1(g)-(k), (m); 2012-83, s. 29; 2015-49, s. 2; 2017-186, s. 2(iiii).

§ 17C-3.
North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission established; members; terms; vacancies. [Effective January 1, 2023]

There is established the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission, hereinafter called “the Commission.” The Commission shall be composed of 35 members as follows:

Police Chiefs. — Three police chiefs selected by the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police and one police chief appointed by the Governor.

Police Officers. — Three police officials appointed by the North Carolina Police Executives Association and two criminal justice officers certified by the Commission as selected by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Officers’ Association.

Departments. — The Attorney General of the State of North Carolina; the Secretary of Public Safety; the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation, the Commander of the State Highway Patrol, and the President of the North Carolina Community Colleges System.

(3a)

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-490, s. 1.2, effective June 30, 2001.

At-large Groups. — One individual representing and appointed by each of the following organizations: one mayor selected by the League of Municipalities; one law-enforcement training officer selected by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Training Officers’ Association; one criminal justice professional selected by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Association; one sworn law-enforcement officer selected by the North State Law-Enforcement Officers’ Association; one member selected by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Women’s Association; and one District Attorney selected by the North Carolina Association of District Attorneys.

Citizens and Others. — The President of The University of North Carolina; the Dean of the School of Government at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill; and two citizens, one of whom shall be selected by the Governor and one of whom shall be selected by the Attorney General. The General Assembly shall appoint four persons, two upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and two upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. Appointments by the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. Appointments by the General Assembly shall be for two-year terms to conclude on June 30th in odd-numbered years.

Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice. — Four correctional officers in management positions employed by the Department of Adult Correction shall be appointed by the General Assembly, two from the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and two from the Division of Prisons upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. Appointments by the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. Appointments by the General Assembly shall serve two-year terms to conclude on June 30th in odd-numbered years or until the appointee no longer serves in a management position with the Department of Adult Correction, whichever occurs first. The Governor shall appoint one correctional officer employed by the Department of Adult Correction and assigned to the Office of Staff Development and Training, and one juvenile justice officer employed by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. The Governor’s appointments shall serve three-year terms or until the appointee is no longer assigned to the Office of Staff Development and Training or is no longer a juvenile justice officer, whichever occurs first.

The members shall be appointed for staggered terms. The initial appointments shall be made prior to September 1, 1983, and the appointees shall hold office until July 1 of the year in which their respective terms expire and until their successors are appointed and qualified as provided hereafter:

For the terms of one year: one member from subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, serving as a police chief; three members from subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, one serving as a police official, and two criminal justice officers; one member from subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section, appointed by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Training Officers’ Association; and two members from subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section, one appointed by the Governor and one appointed by the Attorney General.

For the terms of two years: one member from subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, serving as a police chief; one member from subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, serving as a police official; and two members from subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section, one appointed by the League of Municipalities and one appointed by the North Carolina Association of District Attorneys.

For the terms of three years: two members from subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, one police chief appointed by the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police and one police chief appointed by the Governor; one member from subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, serving as a police official; and three members from subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section, one appointed by the North Carolina Law-Enforcement Women’s Association, one appointed by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Association, and one appointed by the North State Law-Enforcement Officers’ Association.

Thereafter, as the term of each member expires, his successor shall be appointed for a term of three years. Notwithstanding the appointments for a term of years, each member shall serve at the will of the appointing authority.

The Attorney General, the President of The University of North Carolina, the Dean of the School of Government at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, the President of the North Carolina Community Colleges System, the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation, the Commander of the State Highway Patrol, the Secretary of Adult Correction, and the Secretary of Public Safety shall be continuing members of the Commission during their tenure. These members of the Commission shall serve ex officio and shall perform their duties on the Commission in addition to the other duties of their offices. The ex officio members may elect to serve personally at any or all meetings of the Commission or may designate, in writing, one member of their respective office, department, university or agency to represent and vote for them on the Commission at all meetings the ex officio members are unable to attend.

Vacancies in the Commission occurring for any reason shall be filled, for the unexpired term, by the authority making the original appointment of the person causing the vacancy. A vacancy may be created by removal of a Commission member by majority vote of the Commission for misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty. A Commission member may be removed only pursuant to a hearing, after notice, at which the member subject to removal has an opportunity to be heard.

History.

1971, c. 963, s. 3; 1977, c. 70, ss. 29, 30; 1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1191, s. 31; 1983, c. 558, s. 3; c. 618, ss. 1, 2; c. 807, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 282, s. 4; 1989, c. 757, s. 2; 1995, c. 490, s. 15; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(c); 2000-137, s. 4(d); 2000-140, s. 38.1(a); 2001-487, s. 5; 2001-490, s. 1.2; 2006-264, s. 29(c), (d); 2011-145, s. 19.1(g)-(k), (m); 2012-83, s. 29; 2015-49, s. 2; 2017-186, s. 2(iiii); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(hhh).

§ 17C-4.
Compensation.

Members of the Commission who are State officers or employees shall receive no compensation for serving on the Commission, but may be reimbursed for their expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-6

. Members of the Commission who are full-time salaried public officers or employees other than State officers or employees shall receive no compensation for serving on the Commission, but may be reimbursed for their expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-5(b)

. All other members of the Commission may receive compensation and reimbursement for expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-5

.

The Chairman of the Commission may appoint such ad hoc members of the Commission’s standing and select committees as are necessary to carry out the business of the Commission, and such service shall be reimbursed as provided in G.S. 17C-4(a), subject to the approval of the Attorney General.

History.

1971, c. 963, s. 4; 1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1989, c. 757, s. 3.

§ 17C-5.
Chairman; vice-chairman; other officers; meetings; reports.

The Commission shall elect one of the members of the Commission as Chairman at the first regular meeting after July 1 of each year. The ex officio members shall not be eligible for election as Chairman.

The Commission shall select a vice-chairman and such other officers and committee chairmen from among its members as it deems desirable at the first regular meeting of the Commission after its creation and at the first regular meeting after July 1 of each year thereafter. Nothing in this subsection, however, shall prevent the creation or abolition of committees or offices of the Commission, other than the office of vice-chairman, as the need may arise at any time during the year.

The Commission shall hold at least four regular meetings per year upon the call of the chairman. Special meetings shall be held upon the call of the chairman or the vice-chairman, or upon the written request of five members of the Commission. Such special meetings must be held within 30 days.

The Commission shall present regular and special reports and recommendations to the Attorney General or the General Assembly, or both, as the need may arise or as the Attorney General or General Assembly may request.

History.

1971, c. 963, s. 5; 1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1983, c. 807, s. 3.

§ 17C-6.
Powers of Commission.

In addition to powers conferred upon the Commission elsewhere in this Article, the Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be enforceable through its rules and regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of

G.S. 17C-10

:

Promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this Article, which rules may require (i) the submission by any criminal justice agency of information with respect to the employment, education, retention, and training of its criminal justice officers, and (ii) the submission by any criminal justice training school of information with respect to its criminal justice training programs that are required by this Article.

Establish minimum educational and training standards that must be met in order to qualify for entry level employment and retention as a criminal justice officer in temporary or probationary status or in a permanent position. The standards for entry level employment shall include all of the following:

Education and training in response to, and investigation of, domestic violence cases, as well as training in investigation for evidence-based prosecutions.

Education and training on juvenile justice issues, including (i) the handling and processing of juvenile matters for referrals, diversion, arrests, and detention; (ii) best practices for handling incidents involving juveniles; (iii) adolescent development and psychology; and (iv) promoting relationship building with youth as a key to delinquency prevention.

Education and training to develop knowledge and increase awareness of effective mental health and wellness strategies for criminal justice officers.

Certify and recertify, suspend, revoke, or deny, pursuant to the standards that it has established for the purpose, persons as qualified under the provisions of this Article to be employed at entry level and retained as criminal justice officers.

Establish minimum standards for the certification of criminal justice training schools and programs or courses of instruction that are required by this Article.

Certify and recertify, suspend, revoke, or deny, pursuant to the standards that it has established for the purpose, criminal justice training schools and programs or courses of instruction that are required by this Article.

Establish minimum standards and levels of education and experience for all criminal justice instructors and school directors who participate in programs or courses of instruction that are required by this Article.

Certify and recertify, suspend, revoke, or deny, pursuant to the standards that it has established for the purpose, criminal justice instructors and school directors who participate in programs or courses of instruction that are required by this Article or are required and approved by their respective criminal justice agency to include those certified under Chapter 17E or an educational institution accredited by the Commission.

Investigate and make such evaluations as may be necessary to determine if criminal justice agencies, schools, and individuals are complying with the provisions of this Article.

Adopt and amend bylaws, consistent with law, for its internal management and control.

Enter into contracts incident to the administration of its authority pursuant to this Article.

Establish minimum standards and levels of training for certification and periodic recertification of operators of and instructors for training programs in radio microwave, laser, and other electronic speed-measuring instruments.

Certify and recertify, suspend, revoke, or deny, pursuant to the standards that it has established, operators and instructors for training programs for each approved type of radio microwave, laser, and other electronic speed-measuring instruments.

In conjunction with the Secretary of Public Safety, approve use of specific models and types of radio microwave, laser, and other speed-measuring instruments and establish the procedures for operation of each approved instrument and standards for calibration and testing for accuracy of each approved instrument.

(13a)

Expired effective September 30, 2007.

Establish minimum standards for in-service training for criminal justice officers. In-service training standards for sworn law enforcement officers shall include all of the following training topics:

Response to, and investigation of, domestic violence cases, as well as training investigation for evidence-based prosecutions.

Juvenile justice issues, including (i) the handling and processing of juvenile matters for referrals, diversion, arrests, and detention; (ii) best practices for handling incidents involving juveniles; (iii) adolescent development and psychology; and (iv) promoting relationship building with youth as a key to delinquency prevention.

Training to develop knowledge and increase awareness of effective mental health and wellness strategies for justice officers. The standards established shall include two hours of training on this issue every three years.

Ethics.

Mental health for criminal justice officers.

Community policing.

Minority sensitivity.

Use of force.

The duty to intervene and report.

Establish minimum standards and levels of training for certification of instructors for the domestic violence training and juvenile justice training required by subdivisions (2) and (14) of this subsection.

Establish standards and guidelines for the annual firearms certification of qualified retired law enforcement officers, as defined in G.S. 14-415.10(4b), to efficiently implement the provisions of

G.S. 14-415.25

. The standards shall provide for the courses, qualifications, and the issuance of the annual firearms qualification certification. The Commission may adopt any rules necessary to effect the provisions of this section, and may charge a reasonable fee to applicants for the costs incurred in compliance with this subdivision.

Establish minimum educational and training standards for employment and continuing education for criminal justice officers concerning:

Recognizing and appropriately interacting with persons who are deaf or hard of hearing.

Drivers license and vehicle registration identifiers of persons who are deaf or hard of hearing, as authorized by G.S. 20-7(q2), including that those identifiers are optional.

Monitor compliance with G.S. 20-185.1(d).

Establish minimum standards and levels of training for certification of diversion investigators and diversion supervisors, as defined in G.S. 90-113.74(i). As part of these minimum standards, the Commission shall require that certified diversion investigators receive training in the following:

Definition of drug diversion.

Categories of drugs most subject to diversion and misuse.

Methods used to divert drugs.

Proper investigation of drug diversion cases.

Appropriate use of the controlled substances reporting system to investigate drug diversion cases.

Requests of prescriptions and records related to prescriptions pursuant to G.S. 90-107.1, including best practices for working with pharmacies in a manner that minimizes disruption of customer service and pharmacy operations.

Data privacy and security provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and other pertinent federal and State laws governing privacy and security of confidential data and records.

Proper handling of confidential data and records from any source.

Criminal and civil penalties under federal and State law for improperly accessing, handling, or disclosing confidential prescription data or other confidential data or records.

Certify and recertify at least once every three years, suspend, revoke, or deny, pursuant to the standards that it has established for the purpose, persons as qualified to be employed at entry level and retained as diversion investigators and diversion supervisors, as defined in G.S. 90-113.74(i).

Search the National Decertification Index (NDI) maintained by the International Association of Directors of Law Enforcement Standards and Training (IADLEST) using the name of every applicant for certification or applicant for lateral transfer, and any other personal identifying information necessary to complete the search, and shall utilize any record of conviction of a criminal offense received as a result of the search during the application and lateral transfer process to determine if the applicant has any record that would disqualify the applicant for certification.

The Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be advisory in nature and for which the Commission is not authorized to undertake any enforcement actions:

Identify types of criminal justice positions, other than entry level positions, for which advanced or specialized training and education are appropriate, and establish minimum standards for the certification of persons as being qualified for those positions on the basis of specified education, training, and experience; provided, that compliance with these minimum standards shall be discretionary on the part of criminal justice agencies with respect to their criminal justice officers;

Certify, pursuant to the standards that it has established for the purpose, criminal justice officers for those criminal justice agencies that elect to comply with the minimum education, training, and experience standards established by the Commission for positions for which advanced or specialized training, education, and experience are appropriate;

Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, agencies of this State, other governmental agencies, and with universities, colleges, junior colleges, and other institutions concerning the development of criminal justice training schools and programs or courses of instruction;

Study and make reports and recommendations concerning criminal justice education and training in North Carolina;

Conduct and stimulate research by public and private agencies which shall be designed to improve education and training in the administration of criminal justice;

Study, obtain data, statistics, and information and make reports concerning the recruitment, selection, education, retention, and training of persons serving criminal justice agencies in this State; to make recommendations for improvement in methods of recruitment, selection, education, retention, and training of persons serving criminal justice agencies;

Make recommendations concerning any matters within its purview pursuant to this Article;

Appoint such advisory committees as it may deem necessary;

Do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of its authority pursuant to this Article;

Formulate basic plans for and promote the development and improvement of a comprehensive system of education and training for the officers and employees of criminal justice agencies consistent with its rules and regulations;

Maintain liaison among local, State and federal agencies with respect to criminal justice education and training;

Promote the planning and development of a systematic career development program for criminal justice professionals.

All decisions and rules and regulations heretofore made by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Training and Standards Council and the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training System Council shall remain in full force and effect unless and until repealed or suspended by action of the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission established herein. The present Councils are terminated on December 31, 1979, and their power, duties and responsibilities vest in the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission effective January 1, 1980.

The standards established by the Commission pursuant to G.S. 17C-6(a)(11) and 17C-6(a)(12) and by the Commission and the Secretary of Public Safety pursuant to G.S. 17C-6(a)(13) shall not be less stringent than standards established by the U.S. Department of Transportation, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, National Bureau of Standards, or the Federal Communications Commission.

History.

1971, c. 963, s. 6; 1975, c. 372, s. 2; 1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1184, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 757, s. 4; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 14.1; 2000-140, s. 38.1(b); 2002-159, s. 29; 2003-280, s. 3; 2004-186, ss. 2.1, 2.3, 2.5; 2005-27, ss. 1, 2; 2007-427, s. 2; 2009-546, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2016-94, s. 18.2; 2017-57, s. 16D.4(bb); 2017-191, s. 2; 2018-5, ss. 17.1(a), 35.25(d); 2018-44, s. 14(a); 2018-142, s. 23(b); 2021-136, s. 1(a); 2021-137, s. 2(a); 2021-138, ss. 7(a), 11(a), 15(a).

Cross References.

As to admissibility into evidence of results of photographic speed-measuring instruments, see

G.S. 8-50.3

.

§ 17C-7.
Functions of the Department of Justice.

The Attorney General shall provide such staff assistance as the Commission shall require in the performance of its duties.

The Attorney General shall have legal custody of all books, papers, documents, or other records and property of the Commission.

Any papers, documents, or other records which become the property of the Commission that are placed in the criminal justice officer’s personnel file maintained by the Commission shall be subject to the same disclosure requirements as set forth in Chapters 126, 153A, and 160A of the General Statutes regarding the privacy of personnel records.

History.

1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1989, c. 757, s. 5.

§ 17C-8.
System established.

The North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission shall establish a North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training System. The system shall be a cooperative arrangement among criminal justice agencies, both State and local, and criminal justice education and training schools, both public and private, to provide education and training to the officers and employees of the criminal justice agencies of the State of North Carolina and its local governments. Members of the system shall include the North Carolina Justice Academy as well as such other public or private agencies or institutions within the State, that are engaged in criminal justice education and training, and desire to be affiliated with the system for the purpose of achieving greater coordination of criminal justice education and training efforts in North Carolina.

History.

1979, c. 763, s. 1.

§ 17C-9.
Criminal Justice Standards Division of the Department of Justice established; appointment of director; duties.

There is hereby established, within the Department of Justice, the Criminal Justice Standards Division, hereinafter called “the Division,” which shall be organized and staffed in accordance with applicable laws and regulations and within the limits of authorized appropriations.

The Attorney General shall appoint a director for the Division chosen from a list of three nominees submitted to him by the Commission who shall be responsible to and serve at the pleasure of the Attorney General and the Commission.

The Division shall administer such programs as are assigned to it by the Commission. The Division shall also administer such additional related programs as may be assigned to it by the Attorney General or the General Assembly. Administrative duties and responsibilities shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

Administering any and all programs assigned to the Division by the Commission and reporting any violations of or deviations from the rules and regulations of the Commission as the Commission may require;

Compiling data, developing reports, identifying needs and performing research relevant to beneficial improvement of the criminal justice agencies;

Developing new and revising existing programs for adoption consideration by the Commission;

Monitoring and evaluating programs of the Commission;

Providing technical assistance to relevant agencies of the criminal justice system to aid them in the discharge of program participation and responsibilities;

Disseminating information on Commission programs to concerned agencies and/or individuals;

Taking such other actions as may be deemed necessary or appropriate to carry out its assigned duties and responsibilities;

The director may divulge any information in the Division’s personnel file of a criminal justice officer or applicant for certification to the head of the criminal justice agency employing the officer or considering the applicant for employment when the director deems it necessary and essential to the retention or employment of said officer or applicant. The information may be divulged whether or not such information was contained in a personnel file maintained by a State or by a local government agency.

History.

1979, c. 763, s. 1; 1983, c. 807, s. 4.